West Virginia, session 2025, HB2328.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 22, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-32-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 14, 2024, relating to the Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology (speech-language pathology and audiology assistants, 29 CSR 02), is authorized.